Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 4 CLASSES OF LICENSES AND PERMITS
44-3-407. Wholesaler's license - discrimination in wholesale sales prohibited.

A wholesaler's liquor license shall be issued to persons selling vinous or spirituous liquors at wholesale for the following purposes only:

To maintain and operate one or more warehouses in this state to handle vinous or spirituous liquors;

To take orders for vinous and spirituous liquors at any place and deliver vinous and spirituous liquors on orders previously taken to any place if the licensee has procured a wholesaler's liquor license and the place where orders are taken and delivered is a place regularly licensed pursuant to the provisions of this article 3;

To package vinous and spirituous liquors that a licensed importer has legally transported into Colorado or that a licensed manufacturer has legally produced in Colorado.

A wholesaler's beer license shall be issued to persons that sell malt liquors at wholesale to retailers licensed under this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 and that designate to the state licensing authority on their application the territory within which the licensee may sell the designated products of any brewer as agreed upon by the licensee and the brewer of the products for the following purposes only:

To maintain and operate warehouses and one sales room in this state to handle malt liquors to be denominated a wholesale beer store;

To take orders for malt liquors at any place within the territory designated on the license application and deliver malt liquors on orders previously taken to any place within the designated geographical territory, if the licensee has procured a wholesaler's beer license and the place where orders are taken and delivered is a place regularly licensed to sell at retail for consumption on or off the licensed premises pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

Prior to operating a sales room as authorized by this subsection (1)(b), a wholesaler's beer licensee that is licensed pursuant to this section shall, at the time of application to the state licensing authority, send a copy of the application or supplemental application for a sales room to the local licensing authority in the jurisdiction in which the sales room is proposed. The local licensing authority may submit a response to the application, including its determination specified in subsection (1)(b)(II)(B) of this section, to the state licensing authority but must submit its response within forty-five days after the wholesaler's beer licensee submits its sales room application to the state licensing authority. If the local licensing authority does not submit a response to the state licensing authority within forty-five days after submission of the sales room application, the state licensing authority shall deem that the local licensing authority has determined that the proposed sales room will not impact traffic, noise, or other neighborhood concerns in a manner that is inconsistent with local regulations or ordinances or that the applicant will sufficiently mitigate any impacts identified by the local licensing authority.

The state licensing authority must consider the response from the local licensing authority, if any, and may deny the proposed sales room application if the local licensing authority determines that approval of the proposed sales room will impact traffic, noise, or other neighborhood concerns in a manner that is inconsistent with local regulations or ordinances, which may be determined by the local licensing authority without requiring a public hearing, or that the applicant cannot sufficiently mitigate any potential impacts identified by the local licensing authority.

A wholesaler's beer licensee that is operating a sales room as of August 5, 2015, or that is granted approval pursuant to this subsection (1)(b)(II) to operate a sales room on or after August 5, 2015, shall notify the state licensing authority of its sales room. The state licensing authority shall maintain a list of all wholesaler's beer licensee sales rooms in the state and make the list available on its website.

The local licensing authority may request that the state licensing authority take action in accordance with section 44-3-601 against a wholesaler's beer licensee approved to operate a sales room if the local licensing authority demonstrates to the state licensing authority that the licensee has engaged in an unlawful act as set forth in part 9 of this article 3 or shows good cause as specified in section 44-3-103 (19)(a), (19)(b), or (19)(d).

This subsection (1)(b)(II) does not apply if the wholesaler's beer licensee does not sell and serve malt liquors for consumption on the licensed premises.

Each license shall be separate and distinct, but any person may secure both licenses upon the payment in advance of both fees provided in this article 3.

All malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors purchased by any licensee under this section, and all malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors shipped into this state by or to any such licensee, shall be placed in the physical possession of the licensee at the licensee's warehouse facilities prior to delivery to persons holding licenses pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

A brewer or importer licensed pursuant to this article 3 shall not sell malt liquors to a wholesaler without having a written contract with the wholesaler that designates the specific products of such brewer or importer to be sold by the wholesaler and that establishes the territory within which the wholesaler may sell the designated products.

A brewer or importer shall not contract with more than one wholesaler to sell the products of such brewer or importer within the same territory.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article 3 to the contrary, a wholesaler licensed pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section may establish a program for its employees to purchase directly from the wholesaler vinous or spirituous liquors sold by that wholesaler.

It is unlawful for any licensed wholesaler or any person, partnership, association, organization, or corporation interested financially in or with a licensed wholesaler to be interested financially, directly or indirectly, in the business of any person licensed to sell at retail pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

It is unlawful for a licensed wholesaler of vinous or spirituous liquors or any person, partnership, association, organization, or corporation interested financially in or with such a wholesaler to be interested financially in the business of any licensed manufacturer or importer of vinous or spirituous liquors; except that any such financial interest that occurred on or before July 1, 1969, shall be lawful.

A wholesaler shall make available to all retailers licensed pursuant to this article 3 and article 4 of this title 44 in this state without discrimination all malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors offered by the wholesaler for sale at wholesale. A wholesaler shall use its best efforts to make available to licensed retailers each brand of alcohol beverage that the wholesaler has been authorized to distribute.

Nothing in this section prohibits a wholesaler from establishing reasonable allocation procedures when the anticipated demand for a product is greater than the supply of the product.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 999, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

IP(1)(b)(I), (1)(b)(I)(B), (1)(d), (2), and (4)(a) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 8, § 10, effective January 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-406 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-408. Termination of wholesalers - remedies - definitions.

Except as provided in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, no supplier shall terminate an agreement with a wholesaler unless all of the following occur:

The wholesaler fails to comply with a provision of a written agreement between the wholesaler and the supplier;

The wholesaler receives written notification by certified mail, return receipt requested, from the supplier of the alleged noncompliance and is afforded no less than sixty days in which to cure such noncompliance;

The wholesaler fails to cure such noncompliance within the allotted sixty-day cure period; and

The supplier provides written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the wholesaler of such continued failure to comply with the agreement. The notification shall contain a statement of the intention of the supplier to terminate or not renew the agreement, the reasons for termination or nonrenewal, and the date the termination or nonrenewal shall take effect.

If a wholesaler cures an alleged noncompliance within the cure period provided in subsection (1)(a)(II) of this section, any notice of termination from a supplier to a wholesaler shall be null and void.

A supplier may immediately terminate an agreement with a wholesaler, effective upon furnishing written notification to the wholesaler by certified mail, return receipt requested, for any of the following reasons:

The wholesaler's failure to pay any account when due and upon written demand by the supplier for payment, in accordance with agreed payment terms;

The assignment or attempted assignment by the wholesaler for the benefit of creditors, the institution of proceedings in bankruptcy by or against the wholesaler, the dissolution or liquidation of the wholesaler, or the insolvency of the wholesaler;

The revocation or suspension of, or the failure to renew for a period of more than fourteen days, a state, local, or federal license or permit to sell products in this state;

Failure of an owner of a wholesaler to sell his or her ownership interest in the distribution rights to the supplier's products within one hundred twenty days after the owner of a wholesaler has been convicted of a felony that, in the supplier's sole judgment, adversely affects the goodwill of the wholesaler or supplier;

A wholesaler has been convicted of, found guilty of, or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, a charge of violating a law or regulation of the United States or of this state if it materially and adversely affects the ability of the wholesaler or supplier to continue to sell its products in this state;

Any attempted transfer of ownership of the wholesaler, stock of the wholesaler, or stock of any parent corporation of the wholesaler, or any change in the beneficial ownership or control of any entity, without obtaining the prior written approval of the supplier, except as may otherwise be permitted pursuant to a written agreement between the parties;

Fraudulent conduct in the wholesaler's dealings with the supplier or its products, including the intentional sale of products outside the supplier's established quality standards;

The wholesaler ceases to conduct business for five consecutive business days, unless such cessation is the result of an act of God, war, or a condition of national, state, or local emergency; or

Any sale of products, directly or indirectly, to customers located outside the territory assigned to the wholesaler by the supplier. This subsection (2)(i) shall not prohibit wholesalers from making sales to licensed retailers who buy off the wholesaler's dock, so long as the retailer's licensed location is within the wholesaler's assigned territory.

The supplier shall have the right to terminate an agreement with a wholesaler at any time by giving the wholesaler at least ninety days' written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, with copies by first-class mail to all other wholesalers in all other states who have entered into the same distribution agreement with the supplier.

If a particular brand of products is transferred by purchase or otherwise from a supplier to a successor supplier, the following shall occur:

The successor supplier shall notify the existing wholesaler of the successor supplier's intent not to appoint the existing wholesaler for all or part of the existing wholesaler's territory for the product. The successor supplier shall mail the notice of termination by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the existing wholesaler. The successor supplier shall include in the notice the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the successor wholesalers.

The successor wholesaler shall negotiate with the existing wholesaler to determine the fair market value of the existing wholesaler's right to distribute the product in the existing wholesaler's territory immediately before the successor supplier acquired rights to the particular brand of products. The successor wholesaler and the existing wholesaler shall negotiate the fair market value in good faith.

The existing wholesaler shall continue to distribute the product until payment of the compensation agreed to under subsection (4)(b)(I) of this section, or awarded under subsection (4)(c) of this section, is received.

If the successor wholesaler and the existing wholesaler fail to reach a written agreement on the fair market value within thirty days after the existing wholesaler receives the notice required pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, the successor wholesaler or the existing wholesaler shall send a written notice to the other party requesting arbitration pursuant to the uniform arbitration act, part 2 of article 22 of title 13. Arbitration shall be held for the purpose of determining the fair market value of the existing wholesaler's right to distribute the product in the existing wholesaler's territory immediately before the successor supplier acquired rights to the particular brand of products.

Notice of intent to arbitrate shall be sent, as provided in subsection (4)(c)(I) of this section, not later than thirty-five days after the existing wholesaler receives the notice required pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section. The arbitration proceeding shall conclude not later than forty-five days after the date the notice of intent to arbitrate is mailed to a party.

Any arbitration held pursuant to this subsection (4) shall be conducted in a city within this state that:

Is closest to the existing wholesaler; and

Has a population of more than twenty thousand.

Any arbitration held pursuant to this subsection (4)(c) shall be conducted before one impartial arbitrator, to be selected by the American arbitration association or its successor. The arbitration shall be conducted in accordance with the rules and procedures of the uniform arbitration act, part 2 of article 22 of title 13.

An arbitrator's award in any arbitration held pursuant to this subsection (4)(c) shall be monetary only and shall not enjoin or compel conduct. Any arbitration held pursuant to this subsection (4)(c) shall be in lieu of all other remedies and procedures.

The cost of the arbitrator and any other direct costs of an arbitration held pursuant to this subsection (4)(c) shall be equally divided by the parties engaged in the arbitration. All other costs shall be paid by the party incurring them.

The arbitrator in any arbitration held pursuant to this subsection (4)(c) shall render a written decision not later than thirty days after the conclusion of the arbitration, unless this time is extended by mutual agreement of the parties and the arbitrator. The decision of the arbitrator is final and binding on the parties. The arbitrator's award may be enforced by commencing a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction. Under no circumstances may the parties appeal the decision of the arbitrator.

An existing wholesaler or successor wholesaler who fails to participate in the arbitration hearings in any arbitration held pursuant to this subsection (4)(c) waives all rights the existing wholesaler or successor wholesaler would have had in the arbitration and is considered to have consented to the determination of the arbitrator.

If the existing wholesaler does not receive payment from the successor wholesaler of the settlement or arbitration award required under subsection (4)(b) or (4)(c) of this section within thirty days after the date of the settlement or arbitration award:

The existing wholesaler shall remain the wholesaler of the product in the existing wholesaler's territory to at least the same extent that the existing wholesaler distributed the product immediately before the successor wholesaler acquired rights to the product; and

The existing wholesaler is not entitled to the settlement or arbitration award.

Any wholesaler or supplier who is aggrieved by a violation of any provision of subsections (1) and (3) of this section shall be entitled to recovery of damages caused by the violation. Except for a dispute arising under subsection (4) of this section, damages shall be sought in a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Any dispute arising under subsections (1) and (3) of this section may also be settled by such dispute resolution procedures as may be provided by a written agreement between the parties.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or prohibit good-faith settlements voluntarily entered into by the parties.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to give an existing wholesaler or a successor wholesaler any right to compensation if an agreement with the existing wholesaler or successor wholesaler is terminated by a successor supplier pursuant to subsections (1) to (3) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall apply to a manufacturer that produces less than three hundred thousand gallons of malt beverages per calendar year.

As used in this section:

"Existing wholesaler" means a wholesaler who distributes a particular brand of products at the time a successor supplier acquires rights to manufacture or import the particular brand of products.

"Fair market value" means the value that would be determined in a transaction entered into without duress or threat of termination of the existing wholesaler's right and shall include all elements of value, including goodwill and going-concern value.

"Products" means malt liquors.

"Successor supplier" means a primary source of supply, a brewer, or an importer that acquires rights to a product from a predecessor supplier.

"Successor wholesaler" means one or more wholesalers designated by a successor supplier to replace the existing wholesaler, for all or part of the existing wholesaler's territory, in the distribution of the existing product or products.

"Supplier" means any person, partnership, corporation, association, or other business enterprise that is engaged in the manufacturing or importing of products.

"Wholesaler" means the holder of a Colorado wholesaler's beer license.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1001, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(9)(c) and (9)(g) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 8, § 11, effective January 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-406.3 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-409. Retail liquor store license - rules.

A retail liquor store license shall be issued to persons selling only malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors in sealed containers not to be consumed at the place where sold. Malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors in sealed containers shall not be sold at retail other than in retail liquor stores except as provided in section 44-3-410 or except as allowed under this article 3.
(1) (a) (I) A retail liquor store license shall be issued to persons selling only malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors in sealed containers not to be consumed at the place where sold. Malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors in sealed containers shall not be sold at retail other than in retail liquor stores except as provided in section 44-3-410 or except as allowed under this article 3.

On and after July 1, 2016, the state and local licensing authorities shall not issue a new retail liquor store license if the premises for which the retail liquor store license is sought is located:

Within one thousand five hundred feet of another retail liquor store licensed under this section or a liquor-licensed drugstore licensed under section 44-3-410;

For a premises located in a municipality with a population of ten thousand or fewer, within three thousand feet of another retail liquor store licensed under this section or a liquor-licensed drugstore licensed under section 44-3-410; or

For a premises located in a municipality with a population of ten thousand or fewer that is contiguous to the city and county of Denver, within one thousand five hundred feet of another retail liquor store licensed under this section or a liquor-licensed drugstore licensed under section 44-3-410.

In addition, retail liquor stores may sell any nonalcohol products, but only if the annual gross revenues from the sale of nonalcohol products do not exceed twenty percent of the retail liquor store's total annual gross sales revenues. For purposes of calculating the annual gross revenues from the sale of nonalcohol products, sales revenues from the following products are excluded:

Lottery products;

Cigarettes, tobacco products, and nicotine products, as defined in section 18-13-121 (5);

Ice, soft drinks, and mixers; and

Nonfood items related to the consumption of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors.

Nothing in this section or in section 44-3-103 (48) prohibits a licensed retail liquor store from:

Selling items on behalf of or to benefit a charitable organization, as defined in section 39-26-102, or a nonprofit corporation subject to the "Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 121 to 137 of title 7, and determined to be exempt from federal income tax by the federal internal revenue service, if the retail liquor store does not receive compensation for the sale;

At the option of the licensee, displaying promotional material furnished by a manufacturer or wholesaler, which material permits a customer to purchase other items from a third person, so long as the retail liquor store licensee does not receive payment from the third person and the customer orders the additional merchandise directly from the third person; or

Allowing tastings to be conducted on the licensed premises if the licensee has received authorization to conduct tastings pursuant to section 44-3-301.

A person licensed under this section to sell malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors in a retail liquor store:

(I) Shall purchase the malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors only from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this article 3; and

(II) (A) Shall not sell malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors to consumers at a price that is below the retail liquor store's cost, as listed on the invoice, to purchase the malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors, unless the sale is of discontinued or close-out malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors.

(B) This subsection (2)(a)(II) does not prohibit a retail liquor store from operating a bona fide loyalty or rewards program for malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors so long as the price for the product is not below the retail liquor store's costs as listed on the invoice. The state licensing authority may adopt rules to implement this subsection (2)(a)(II).

A person licensed under this section that obtains additional retail liquor store licenses in accordance with subsection (4)(b)(III) of this section may operate under a single or consolidated corporate entity but shall not commingle purchases of or credit extensions for purchases of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors from a wholesaler licensed under this article 3 for more than one licensed premises. A wholesaler licensed under this article 3 shall not base the price for the malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors it sells to a retail liquor store licensed under this section on the total volume of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors that the licensee purchases for multiple licensed premises.

A person licensed to sell at retail who complies with this subsection (3) and rules promulgated pursuant to this subsection (3) may deliver malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors to a person of legal age if:

The person receiving the delivery of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors is located at a place that is not licensed pursuant to this section;

The delivery is made by an employee of the licensed retail liquor store who is at least twenty-one years of age and who is using a vehicle owned or leased by the licensee to make the delivery;

The person making the delivery verifies, in accordance with section 44-3-901 (11), that the person receiving the delivery of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors is at least twenty-one years of age; and

The retail liquor store derives no more than fifty percent of its gross annual revenues from total sales of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from the sale of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors that the retail liquor store delivers.

The state licensing authority shall promulgate rules as necessary for the proper delivery of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors and is authorized to issue a permit to any person who is licensed under this section to sell at retail and delivers the liquors pursuant to this subsection (3). A permit issued under this subsection (3) is subject to the same suspension and revocation provisions as are set forth in section 44-3-601 for other licenses granted pursuant to this article 3.

Except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, it is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a retail liquor store to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3.

An owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a retail liquor store may have an interest in:

An arts license granted under this article 3;

An airline public transportation system license granted under this article 3;

For a retail liquor store licensed on or before January 1, 2016, and whose license holder is a Colorado resident, additional retail liquor store licenses as follows, but only if the premises for which a license is sought satisfies the distance requirements specified in subsection (1)(a)(II) of this section:

On or after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2022, one additional retail liquor store license, for a maximum of up to two total retail liquor store licenses;

On or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027, up to two additional retail liquor store licenses, for a maximum of three total retail liquor store licenses; and

On or after January 1, 2027, up to three additional retail liquor store licenses, for a maximum of four total retail liquor store licenses; or

A financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

A liquor-licensed drugstore may apply to the state and local licensing authorities, as part of a single application, for a merger and conversion of retail liquor store licenses to a single liquor-licensed drugstore license as provided in section 44-3-410 (1)(b).

Source:

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (SB 18-067), ch. 4, p. 31, § 2, effective March 1; (1)(a)(II) amended, (SB 18-243), ch. 366, p. 2201, § 8, effective June 4; entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1005, § 2, effective October 1; (2) and (3) amended, (SB 18-243), ch. 366, p. 2201, § 8, effective January 1, 2019.